District of Columbia statutes.
42-3531.02

Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to establish the Office of the Tenant Advocate as an independent agency to advocate on behalf of the education of, and outreach to, tenants and the people of the District.

Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 2062, 52 DCR 7503
Oct. 1, 2007, D.C. Law 16-181, § 2(b), 53 DCR 6703
D.C. Law 16-181 substituted “as an independent agency” for “as an office within the Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs”.
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2062 of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).
Section 5 of D.C. Law 16-181 provided: “Section 2 through 4 shall apply as of October 1, 2007.”